Alabama, session 2026rs, HB640.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. A state-supported public institution of
higher education may accept the Classic Learning Test (CLT) to
the same extent the institution accepts the American College
Test (ACT) and the Scholastic Aptitude Test (SAT) for
demonstrating college readiness and satisfying admissions
Page 1

demonstrating college readiness and satisfying admissions
HB640 INTRODUCED
criteria, as determined by the Alabama Commission on Higher
Education and the individual boards of trustees of each
institution.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on June 1,
2026.
Page 2